Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1857.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Artificial Intelligence Transparency in Services Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Artificial intelligence." As follows:(1) A machine-based system that can, for a given set of human-defined objectives, make predictions, recommendations or decisions influencing real or virtual environments, including the ability to:123456789101112131415161718 (i) perceive real and virtual environments;(ii) abstract perceptions made under this paragraph into models through analysis in an automated manner; and(iii) use model inference to formulate options for information or action based on outcomes under subparagraphs (i) and (ii).(2) The term includes generative artificial intelligence."Business entity." A for-profit corporation, limited liability company, partnership, limited liability partnership or Subchapter S corporation formed or organized under the laws of this Commonwealth or another jurisdiction."Consumer interaction." A communication, transaction or service directed toward an individual resident of this Commonwealth."Generative artificial intelligence." A class of models that emulate the structure and characteristics of input data in order to generate derived synthetic content, including information such as images, videos, audio clips or text, that has been significantly modified or generated by algorithms, including by artificial intelligence."High-impact decision." A decision or determination that materially affects an individual's legal rights, employment, housing, credit, education, health care or access to government benefits.Section 3. Disclosure requirement.(a) Duty of business entity.--A business entity that uses artificial intelligence in any part of a consumer interaction shall disclose the use of artificial intelligence in a clear and conspicuous manner to the consumer at the beginning of the 20250HB1857PN2298 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 consumer interaction.(b) Format.--The business entity shall deliver the disclosure in plain language, orally or in writing, which language must be reasonably accessible to an individual with a disability or limited English proficiency.(c) Human representatives.--Upon request, the business entity shall provide the consumer with timely access to a human representative, if a human representative is reasonably available.Section 4. High-impact decisions.(a) Right to human review.--A consumer shall have the right to request that a human representing the business entity review any consumer interaction involving a high-impact decision.(b) Notice.--When the conditions under section 3 are met requiring the disclosure of the use of artificial intelligence in a consumer interaction and involve a high-impact decision, the business entity shall disclose in a clear and conspicuous manner that the consumer has a right to request a human review by the business entity involving the high-impact decision.(c) Time frame.--A business entity shall commence the human review not later than 14 days after the request for a human review is made. The human review shall be completed and the decision delivered to the requester not later than 28 days after the request for a human review is made.Section 5. Enforcement.(a) Civil penalties.--The Attorney General may bring a civil action under the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law, for civil penalties not exceeding $2,500 per violation to enforce this act.20250HB1857PN2298 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Private right of action.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit any other remedy available at law.Section 6. Effective date.This act shall take effect in six months.20250HB1857PN2298 - 4 - 1234